Utah statutes.
65A-5-2.   Deposit and allocation of money received.

(1) (a)  The division shall pay to the state treasurer all money received, accompanied by a statement showing the respective sources of this money.

(b)  Each source shall be classified as to sales, rentals, royalties, interest, fees, penalties, and forfeitures.

(2) (a)  All money received by the division as a first or down payment on applications to purchase, permit, or lease state lands or minerals shall be paid to the state treasurer and held in suspense pending final action on those applications.

(b)  After final action these payments shall either be credited to the appropriate fund or account, or refunded to the applicant in accordance with the action taken.

